Utah statutes.
63L-4-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Constitutional taking issues" means actions involving the physical taking or exaction of private real property by a political subdivision that might require compensation to a private real property owner because of:

(a)  the Fifth or Fourteenth Amendment of the Constitution of the United States;

(b)  Article I, Section 22 of the Utah Constitution; or

(c)  any recent court rulings governing the physical taking or exaction of private real property by a government entity.

(2)  "Political subdivision" means a county, municipality, local district, special service district, school district, or other local government entity.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

